Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 25. Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act

38-25-101.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act”.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

R&RE, p. 694, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-6-1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1255, § 1, effective July 1.

38-25-101.5.
Scope.

This article applies only to federal tax liens and to other federal liens notices of which under any act of congress or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto are required or permitted to be filed in the same manner as notices of federal tax liens.

History.

Source:
L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1255, § 2, effective July 1.

38-25-102.
Federal liens - places of filing.

Notices of liens, certificates, and other notices affecting federal tax liens or other federal liens must be filed in accordance with this article.

Notices of liens upon real property for obligations payable to the United States and certificates and notices affecting the liens shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the real property subject to the liens is situated.

Notices of federal liens upon personal property, whether tangible or intangible, for obligations payable to the United States and certificates and notices affecting the liens shall be filed as follows:

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is a corporation, partnership, or limited liability company whose chief executive office is in this state, as these entities are defined in the internal revenue laws of the United States, in the office of the secretary of state;

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is a trust that is not covered by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), in the office of the secretary of state;

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is the estate of a decedent, in the office of the secretary of state;

In all other cases, where the person against whose interest the lien applies has his, her, or its principal residence in this state at the time of recording of the notice of lien, the notice of lien shall be recorded in the office of the secretary of state.

(2.5)

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2001, p. 1431, § 11, effective July 1, 2001.)

History.

Source:
L. 69:

R&RE, p. 694, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-6-2.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1255, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 752, § 23, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2001:

(2) and (2.5) amended, p. 1431, § 11, effective July 1.

38-25-103.
Execution of notices and certificates.

Certification of notices of liens, certificates, or other notices affecting federal liens by the secretary of the treasury of the United States or his delegate, or by any official or entity of the United States responsible for the filing or certifying of notice of any other lien, entitles them to be filed, and no other attestation, certification, or acknowledgment is necessary.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

R&RE, p. 694, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-6-3.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1256, § 4, effective July 1.

38-25-104.
Duties of filing officer.

If a notice of federal lien, a refiling of a notice of federal lien, or a notice of revocation of any certificate described in subsection (2) of this section is presented to a filing officer who is:

The secretary of state, then the secretary of state shall cause the notice to be marked, held, and indexed in accordance with the provisions of section 4-9-519, C.R.S., as if the notice were a financing statement within the meaning of such section; or

The county clerk and recorder, then the county clerk and recorder shall endorse thereon the county clerk and recorder’s identification and the date and time of receipt and forthwith record and index in the real estate records in accordance with the provisions of sections 30-10-408 and 30-10-409, C.R.S., showing the name and address of the person named in the notice, the date and time of receipt, the title and address of the official or entity certifying the lien, and the total amount appearing on the notice of lien.

If a certificate of release, nonattachment, discharge, or subordination of any lien is presented to the secretary of state for filing, the secretary of state shall:

Cause a certificate of release or nonattachment to be marked, held, and indexed as if the certificate were a termination statement within the meaning of the “Uniform Commercial Code”, but the notice of lien to which the certificate relates may not be removed from the files; and

Cause a certificate of discharge or subordination to be marked, held, and indexed as if the certificate were a release of collateral within the meaning of the “Uniform Commercial Code”.

If a refiled notice of federal lien referred to in subsection (1) of this section or any of the certificates or notices referred to in subsection (2) of this section is presented for recording to any county clerk and recorder, such clerk and recorder shall enter the refiled notice or the certificate with the date of recording in the index in accordance with the provisions of sections 30-10-408 and 30-10-409, C.R.S.

Upon request of any person, the filing officer shall issue a certificate showing whether there is on file, or recorded on the date and hour stated therein, any notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting any lien filed under this article, naming a particular person and, if a notice or certificate is on file, giving the date and hour of filing of each notice or certificate. The fee for the issuance of a certificate by the secretary of state shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., and the fee for the issuance of a certificate by a county clerk and recorder shall be five dollars. Upon request, the filing officer shall furnish a copy of any notice of federal lien or notice or certificate affecting a federal lien. The fee for furnishing and for certifying such copy and affixing the seal thereto shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., if furnished by the secretary of state, and the said fee shall be five dollars, if furnished by a county clerk and recorder.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

R&RE, p. 694, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-6-4.

L. 83:

(4) amended, p. 1229, § 17, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 880, § 50, effective July 1; (4) R&RE, p. 2056, § 37, effective October 14.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1256, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1), IP(2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 438, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(a), IP(2), and (4) amended, p. 753, § 24, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2001:

(1)(a), IP(2), and (4) amended, p. 1432, § 12, effective July 1.

38-25-105.
Fees.

A fee shall be charged for filing or recording and indexing each notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting the lien:

For a lien on real estate;

For a lien on tangible and intangible personal property;

For a certificate of discharge or subordination;

For all other notices, including a certificate of release or nonattachment.

The fee charged by a county clerk and recorder for filing and indexing each notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting the lien shall be five dollars.

When the filing officer is the secretary of state, the fees required by this subsection (1) shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S.

The filing officer shall bill the district directors of internal revenue or other appropriate federal officials on a monthly basis for fees for documents filed by them.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

R&RE, p. 695, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-6-5.

L. 83:

(1) R&RE, p. 1230, § 18, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 880, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 88:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), and (2) amended, p. 1257, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(b) amended, p. 709, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(b) amended, p. 439, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(c) amended, p. 754, § 25, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2001:

(1)(c) and (2) amended, p. 1432, § 13, effective July 1.

38-25-106.
Lien not valid until notice filed.

Prior to the time of the filing of a notice of lien in the office of the secretary of state or the county clerk and recorder, as the case may be, the lien shall not be valid as against any mortgagee, purchaser, or judgment creditor.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

R&RE, p. 695, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-6-6.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 754, § 26, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 1432, § 14, effective July 1.

38-25-107.
Uniformity of interpretation.

This article shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this article among states enacting it.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

R&RE, p. 695, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-6-7.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1258, § 7, effective July 1.